DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-325
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI3RO-01

CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC |co200/3 1t0oC0215/34 Speed SensorCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The speed sensor detects wheel speed and sends the ap-
Speed Sensor propriate signals to the ECU. These signals are used for control
ofthe ABS control system. The frontandrear rotors each have
48 serrations.

Whentherotors rotate, the magnetic field emitted by the perma-
nent magnet in the speed sensor generates an AC voltage.
Since the frequency of this AC voltage changes in direct propor-
tion to the speed of the rotor, the frequency is used by the ECU
High Speed to detect the speed of each wheel.

N

Low Speed

+V

BR3583 -V
BR3582 F00010

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Detectionofany ofconditions (1) through (4):
(1) Atvehiclespeedof  12km/h (6 mph) or more, pulses
are not input for 30 secs.

2) Momentary interruption of the speed sensor signal
co200/3 1 |® y Inferrpti P 9

C0205 / 32 occurs atleast 7 timesin the time between switching « Rightfront, left front, rightrear and leftrear speed sensor
C0210/33 the ignition switch ON and switching it OFF. * Each speed sensor circuit
C0215 /34 (8) Continuous noise occursinto the speed sensor * Sensorrotor

signals with the vehicle speed at 20 km/h ( 12mph) or

more.

(4) The condition that the speed sensor signal circuit is
open continues for 0.6 secs. or more.
HINT:

DTCNo.C0200/3 1 isfortherightfrontspeedsensor.

DTC No. C0205 / 32 is for the left front speed sensor.

DTCNo.C02 10/33isfortherightrearspeedsensor.

DTCNo.C02 15/34isfortheleftrear speedsensor.

Fail safe function:

If trouble occurs in the speed sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKEBOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTICS

1HD-T, 1HZ

RHD:

ABS ECU
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*1: Rigid Axle Suspension

*2: Independent Suspension

*3: Shielded
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER DI-329
SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

Start the inspection from step 1 in case of using the hand held tester and start from step 2 in case of not using
the hand held tester.

1 | Check output value of speed sensor.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connectthe hand held tester to the DLC3.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand held tester main switch ON.
(c) Select the DATALIST mode on the hand held tester.
CHECK:
Check that there is no difference between the speed value output from the speed sensor displayed on the
hand held tester and the speed value displayed on the speedometer when driving the vehicle.
OK:
There is almost no difference from the displayed speed value.
HINT:
There is tolerance of = 10 % in the speedometer indication.

OK> Check and replace ABS ECU.

NG

2 [ Check speed sensor.

FRONT:

PREPARATION:

(a) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector
lock part and connecting part of the connector.

(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.

CHECK:
“@j_ LH Side:
RH Side - Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 3 of speed sensor
1 2 1 connector.
RH side:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of speed sensor
connector.

OK:

@ LOCK | H side

F04508 Resistance: 0.92 - 1.22 kQ

CHECK:
LH Side:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 3 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
RH Side:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or higher
LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)



DI-330 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM
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REAR:
PREPARATION:
(@) Make sure that there is no looseness at the connector
lock part and connecting part of the connector.
(b) Disconnect speed sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of speed sensor
connector.
OK:
Resistance: 1.0 - 1.4 kQ
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal 1 or 2 of speed sensor
connector and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or higher

NG> Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI-312).

3 [ Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between each speed
sensor and ECU (See page IN-35).

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.




DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER DI-331

SUPPLY SYSTEM

4 Check sensor installation.

i
V07

b

BR3795

OK

CHECK:

Check the speed sensor installation.

OK:
The installation bolt is tightened properly and there is
no clearance between the sensor and front steering
knuckle or rear axle carrier.

NG> Replace speed sensor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI-312).

5 [ Check speed sensor and sensor rotor serrations.

(REFERENCE) INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

Normal Signal Waveform

/\
d/\\//\\JA\/' "~

2 m/s / Division
1V / Division W04200

NG
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PREPARATION:

(a) Remove the ABS ECU.

(b) Connect the oscilloscope to the each of terminals FR+,
FL+, RR+ or RL+ and GND of the ABS ECU.

CHECK:

Drive the vehicle at about 20 km/h (12 mph), and check the sig-

nal waveform.

OK> Check and replace ABS ECU.




DI-332 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM

6 [ Check sensor rotor and sensor tip.

BR3720

F04443

@

FRONT:
PREPARATION:
(a) RFS:

Remove the steering axle shaft (See page SA-40).
(b) IFS:

Remove the front drive shaft (See page SA-49).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove front speed sensor (See page BR—-89).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.
REAR:
PREPARATION:
(@ RFS:

Remove the rear axle hub (See page SA-171).
(b) IFS:

Remove the rear axle shaft (See page SA-161).
CHECK:
Check the sensor rotor serrations.
OK:

No scratches, missing teeth or foreign objects.
PREPARATION:
Remove rear speed sensor (See page BR-92).
CHECK:
Check the sensor tip.
OK:

No scratches or foreign objects on the sensor tip.

NG> Replace speed sensor or rotor.

NOTICE:
Check the speed sensor signal last (See page DI-312).

Check and replace ABS ECU.
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